Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 20. Virginia Highway Corporation Act of 1988.
§ 56-550.
Police powers; violations of law.

The roadways and highways constructed or operated under this chapter may be policed in whole or in part by officers of the Department of State Police, even though all or some portion of any such projects lie within the corporate limits of a municipality
or other political subdivision, and just as if the roadway and highway were a part of the state highway system. The operator and the Department of State Police shall agree upon reasonable terms and conditions pursuant to which
the activities contemplated in this section may take place. Such officers shall be under the exclusive control and direction of the Superintendent of State Police and shall be responsible for the preservation of public peace, prevention
of crime, apprehension of criminals, protection of the rights of persons and property, and enforcement of the laws of the Commonwealth, within the limits of any highway and roadway. All other police officers of the Commonwealth
and of each county, city, town or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth through which any roadway, or portion thereof, extends shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the limits of such roadways and highways
as they have beyond such limits and shall have access to the highway and roadway at any time for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction. This authority does not extend to the private offices, buildings, garages
and other improvements of the operator to any greater degree than the police power extends to any other private buildings and improvements.

The traffic and motor vehicle laws of the Commonwealth shall apply to persons and motor vehicles on the roadway or highway, as shall Chapter 8 (§

33.2-800

et seq.) of Title 33.2, and the powers of arrest of police officers shall be the same as those applying to conduct on the state highway system. Punishment for offenses shall be as prescribed by law for conduct occurring
on the state highway system.

History.
1988, c. 649.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

§ 56-551.
Termination of certificate; dedication of assets.

Within ninety days of the completion and closing of the original permanent financing, the operator shall provide full details of the financing, including the terms of all bonds, to the Commission; and shall certify the term of the original permanent financing
and its termination date. The Commission may require that the operator provide copies of any relevant documents, and shall review the financing and determine the date of termination of the original permanent financing. After establishing
this date, the Commission shall enter an order terminating the operator’s authority pursuant to the certificate of authority on a date which shall be ten years from the end of the term of the original permanent financing. At the request
of the operator or the Department, or on its own initiative, the Commission may revise its order to modify the date for termination of the certificate of authority in order to take into account any refinancing of the original permanent
financing, where the refinancing or modification is in the public interest, or any refinancing for the purpose of expansion, or early termination of the original permanent financing. Upon the termination of the certificate of authority,
the authority and duties of the operator under this chapter shall cease, and the highway assets and improvements of the operator shall be dedicated to the Commonwealth for highway purposes.

History.
1988, c. 649; 1991, c. 272.

§ 56-552.
Improvement Fund.

There shall be a fund established by the Commonwealth Transportation Board, from the toll revenues described in this section, for the purpose of funding transportation improvements which are related to or affected by the toll road. Toll rates shall be
set in multiples of five cents; however, the Commission shall order that that percentage of each toll by which the toll established exceeds that necessary to provide the operator with an amount necessary to meet the operator’s obligations
under § 56-543 and earn a reasonable return shall be committed to the fund. In addition the operator, the Board, and the local governments through which the road passes may jointly petition the Commission to establish an additional
toll amount to be committed to this fund.

History.
1988, c. 649.